ling073-abe-master/apertium-abe.abe.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Western Abenaki

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Nouns
Verbs
Conjunctions
Pronouns
Adverbs
Prepositions
Participles
Particles
VerbSer
Adjectives

PATTERN Nouns
Possessive?(1) (NounRoot[aa] NounTags[aa]) Possessive?(2) NounPlural[aa]?
Possessive?(1) (NounRoot[nn] NounTags[nn]) Possessive?(2) NounPlural[nn]?
Possessive?(1) (NounRoot[aa] NounTags[aa]) [ <loc>:{LOC}{I}k{w} ]? Possessive?(2)
Possessive?(1) (NounRoot[nn] NounTags[nn]) [ <loc>:{LOC}{I}k{w} ]? Possessive?(2)
Possessive?(1) (NounRoot[aa] NounTags[aa]) [ <loc><pl>:{LOC}{PL}ikok ]? Possessive?(2)
Possessive?(1) (NounRoot[nn] NounTags[nn]) [ <loc><pl>:{LOC}{PL}ikok ]? Possessive?(2)

PATTERN Adjectives
(AdjectiveRoot[aa] AdjectiveTags[aa]) AdjectivePlural[aa]?
(AdjectiveRoot[nn] AdjectiveTags[nn]) AdjectivePlural[nn]?

PATTERN Verbs
VerbClitic(1)? (VerbRoot[tv,aa] VerbTags[tv,aa]) [ <ref>:>z ]? [ <past>:p ]? PeripheralFormative[tv,aa]? VerbClitic(2)?
VerbClitic(1)? (VerbRoot[tv,nn] VerbTags[tv,nn]) [ <ref>:>z ]? [ <past>:p ]? PeripheralFormative[tv,nn]? VerbClitic(2)?
VerbClitic(1)? (VerbRoot[iv,aa] VerbTags[iv,aa]) [ <ref>:>z ]? [ <past>:p ]? PeripheralFormative[iv,aa]? VerbClitic(2)?
VerbClitic(1)? (VerbRoot[iv,nn] VerbTags[iv,nn]) [ <ref>:>z ]? [ <past>:p ]? PeripheralFormative[iv,nn]? VerbClitic(2)?
(VerbRoot[tv,aa] VerbTags[tv,aa]) Subjunctive

PATTERN VerbSer
VerbSer

PATTERN Conjunctions
Conjunction

PATTERN Pronouns
Pronoun

PATTERN Adverbs
Adverb

PATTERN Prepositions
Preposition

PATTERN Participles
(VerbRoot[tv,aa] VerbTags[tv,aa]) [ <pt>:>t ]
(VerbRoot[tv,nn] VerbTags[tv,nn]) [ <pt>:>t ]
(VerbRoot[iv,aa] VerbTags[iv,aa]) [ <pt>:>t ]
(VerbRoot[iv,nn] VerbTags[iv,nn]) [ <pt>:>t ]

PATTERN Particles
Particle

#PATTERN VerbStem
#VerbRoot Valence ScenarioMarker

LEXICON VerbRoot
mil:mil{ȣ}[tv,aa] #give
wajȣnem:wajȣnem[tv,nn] #have
namih:namih{ȣ}[tv,aa] #see
wanȣdamina:wanȣdamina[iv,aa] #be crazy
pado:pado[tv,aa] #bring
paiȣd:paiȣda[iv,aa] #come
wȣban:wȣban[iv,aa] #dawn
kizi:kizi[iv,aa] #be able
nanibȣsa:nanibȣsa[iv,aa] #walk all night
kizilȣn:kizilȣn[iv,nn] #be after rain
idamow:idamow[iv,nn] #mean
almagwanosa:almagwanosa[iv,aa] #disappear
kisgad:kisgad[iv,nn] #be daytime
lidahȣdam:lidahȣdam[tv,nn] #think
walȣbai:walȣbai[iv,aa] #be good looking
pmȣwzi:pmȣwzi[iv,aa] #live
agakimezi:agakimezi[tv,aa] #learn
ozȣlȣwzȣ:ozȣlȣwz{ȣ}[iv,aa] #survive
mȣjassa:mȣjassa[iv,aa] #begin
kawhȣwa:kawhȣwa[iv,aa] #win
migaka:migaka[iv,aa] #make war
nlika:nlika[tv,aa] #kill
wdena:wdena[tv,aa] #take someone
wdena:wdena[tv,nn] #take something
wakassigadek:wakassigadek[iv,nn] #few years pass
mȣjaga:mȣjaga[iv,aa] #grow
sogwebasob:sogwebasob[iv,nn] #melt
nȣwat:nȣwat[iv,nn] #long ago
kottlaboak:kottlaboak[iv,aa] #be together
wajȣnem:wajȣnem[tv,nn] #have
aimek:aimek[iv,aa] #be present
wlȣmawaldam:wlȣmawaldam[tv,nn] #believe
permosa:permosa[iv,aa] #walk
wassana:wassana[tv,aa] #illuminate
agwȣkazem:agwȣkazem[tv,nn] #burned food
majipogwad:majipogwad[iv,nn] #taste bad
wlipogwad:wlipogwad[iv,nn] #taste good
osagipogwad:osagipogwad[iv,nn] #taste bitter
mȣw:mȣw{Ȣ}[tv,aa] #eat
dalawagipogwat:dalawagipogwat[iv,nn] #be crunchy
bemioo:bemioo[iv,nn] #be greasy
ponamen:ponamen[iv,nn] #put
alaji:alaji[iv,aa] #be like
agwȣgwahla:agwȣgwahla[iv,nn] #become spoiled
liwitamen:liwitamen[tv,nn] #call
acowiba:acowiba[iv,aa] #should
achwi:achwi[iv,aa] #should
ao:ao[iv,aa]

LEXICON VerbSer
ai<vbser><iv><aa>:ai[iv,aa]
aidid<vbser><iv><aa><past>:aidid[iv,aa]

LEXICON VerbTags
<vb><tv><aa>:[tv,aa]
<vb><tv><nn>:[tv,nn]
<vb><iv><aa>:[iv,aa]
<vb><iv><nn>:[iv,nn]

LEXICON PeripheralFormative
<prx><3pl>:{A}k[tv,aa]
<prx><3pl>:{A}k[iv,aa]
<prx><3pl>:{A}l[tv,nn]
<prx><3pl>:{A}l[iv,nn]
<obv><3sg>:{A}
<obv><3pl>:{A}

LEXICON Subjunctive
<subj><pass><s_1sg>:imek
<subj><pass><s_2sg>:elek
<subj><pass><s_3sg>:ȣmek
<subj><pass><s_1sg><neg>:imokw
<subj><pass><s_2sg><neg>:elokw
<subj><pass><s_3sg><neg>:ȣmokw

<subj><ref><s_1sg>:zia
<subj><ref><s_2sg>:zian
<subj><ref><s_3sg>:zit
<subj><ref><s_1sg><neg>:ziwa
<subj><ref><s_2sg><neg>:ziwan
<subj><ref><s_3sg><neg>:zikw

<subj><s_1sg><o_2sg>:elan
<subj><s_1sg><o_2pl>:elakw
<subj><s_1sg><o_3sg>:ok
<subj><s_2sg><o_1sg>:ian
<subj><s_2sg><o_3sg>:ȣan
<subj><s_3sg><o_1sg>:it
<sub><s_3sg><o_2sg>:goam
<subj><s_3sg><o_3sg>:ȣt
<subj><s_1pl><o_2sg>:elak
<subj><s_1pl_excl><o_3sg>:ȣak
<subj><s_1pl_incl><o_3sg>:ȣakw
<subj><s_2pl><o_1sg>:iakw
<subj><s_2pl><o_3sg>:ȣakw
<sub><s_3pl><o_1sg>:ihidit

<subj><s_1sg><o_2sg><neg>:elowan
<subj><s_1sg><o_2pl><neg>:elowakw
<subj><s_1sg><o_3sg><neg>:ȣwa
<subj><s_2sg><o_1sg><neg>:iwan
<subj><s_2sg><o_3sg><neg>:ȣwan
<subj><s_3sg><o_1sg><neg>:ikw
<sub><s_3sg><o_2sg><neg>:gowwam
<subj><s_3sg><o_3sg><neg>:ȣkw
<subj><s_1pl><o_2sg><neg>:elowak
<subj><s_1pl_excl><o_3sg><neg>:ȣwak
<subj><s_1pl_incl><o_3sg><neg>:ȣwakw
<subj><s_2pl><o_1sg><neg>:iwakw
<subj><s_2pl><o_3sg><neg>:ȣwakw
<sub><s_3pl><o_1sg><neg>:ihidikw

LEXICON VerbClitic(2)
:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1sg><o_3sg_ind>:
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_3sg_ind>:
:>             <s_3sg><o_3sg_ind>:a
:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_excl><o_3sg_ind>:bna
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_incl><o_3sg_ind>:bna
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2pl><o_3sg_ind>:ba
:>             <s_3pl><o_3sg_ind>:ak

:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1sg><o_3sg_def_nn>:n
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_3sg_def_nn>:n
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3sg><o_3sg_def_nn>:n
:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_excl><o_3sg_def_nn>:nana
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_incl><o_3sg_def_nn>:nana
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2pl><o_3sg_def_nn>:nnȣ
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3pl><o_3sg_def_nn>:nnȣ

:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1sg><o_3pl_def_nn>:nal
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_3pl_def_nn>:nal
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3sg><o_3pl_def_nn>:n
:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_excl><o_3pl_def_nn>:nanawal
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_incl><o_3pl_def_nn>:nanawal
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2pl><o_3pl_def_nn>:nnȣl
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3pl><o_3pl_def_nn>:nnȣl

:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1sg><o_3sg_def_aa>:na
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_3sg_def_aa>:na
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3sg><o_3sg_def_aa>:na
:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_excl><o_3sg_def_aa>:nana
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_incl><o_3sg_def_aa>:nana
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2pl><o_3sg_def_aa>:nnȣ
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3pl><o_3sg_def_aa>:nnȣ

:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1sg><o_3pl_def_aa>:na  #Dir/RL
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_3pl_def_aa>:na  #Dir/RL
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3sg><o_3pl_def_aa>:na  #Dir/RL
:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_excl><o_3pl_def_aa>:nana  #Dir/RL
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1pl_incl><o_3pl_def_aa>:nana  #Dir/RL
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2pl><o_3sg_def_pl>:nnȣ  #Dir/RL
:w{ʻ}>         <s_3pl><o_3sg_def_pl>:nnȣ  #Dir/RL

:n{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_3sg><o_1sg>:eg{W}
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_3sg><o_2sg>:eg{W}
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_1sg>:el
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_1sg><ind_nn>:i
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_2sg><o_1sg><def_nn>:in
:k{ʻ}{d}{ʻ}>   <s_1sg><o_2sg><def_nn>:en

LEXICON NounTags
<n><aa>:[aa]
<n><nn>:[nn]

LEXICON AdjectiveTags
<adj><aa>:[aa]
<adj><nn>:[nn]

LEXICON NounRoot
kanal:kanal>[aa] #teakettle
badoziz:badoziz>[nn] #little rowboat
alokad:aloka{D}>[aa] #worker
amiskw:amisk{w}>[aa] #beaver
azeskwamagw:azeskwamag{w}>[aa] #mud fish
abitȣ:abitȣ>[aa] #farmer
alȣtegwihla:alȣtegwihla>[aa] #wood duck
bamskoda:bamskoda>[nn] #meadow
bakagaȣwtag:bakagaȣwtag>[nn] #crosspiece of a canoe
bamskodaitegw:bamskodaiteg{w}>[nn] #prairie stream
bakwaaskw:bakwaask{w}>[nn] #cattail
wizenȣ:wizenȣ>[nn] #beaver castor
migwen:migwen{w}>[aa] #feather
madagen:magaden{w}>[nn] #hide
adialwassem:adialwassem{w}>[aa] #hunting dog
kaozem:kaozem>[aa] #cow
kaozen:kaozen>[aa] #cow
zigwada:zigwada>[nn] #skeleton
ababskweda:ababskweda>[nn] #stove
sibsiz:sibsiz>[aa] #little bird
skweda:skweda>[nn] #fire
msazesko:msazesko>[nn] #much mud
abagapskw:abagapsk{w}>[nn] #flat rock
skog:skog>[aa] #snake
abagijiman:abagijiman>[nn] #rowboat
gȣgajigapskw:gȣgajigapsk{w}>[nn] #cliff
pkwami:pkwami>[aa] #ice
aki:aki>[nn] #earth
awaas:awaas>[aa] #wild animal
awahȣdos:awahȣdos>[aa] #little devil, bug
namas:namas>[aa] #fish
nebes:nebes>[nn] #lake
abazi:abazi>[aa] #tree
abazi:abazi>[nn] #stick
medawlinȣgan:medawlinȣgan>[nn] #shamanic power
pȣgwas:pȣgwas>[aa] #moonlight
managwȣn:managwȣn>[aa] #rainbow
migakawinno:migakawinno>[aa] #fighter
lakamigwezo:lakamigwezo>[aa] #family
skamon:skamon>[nn] #corn
nigȣ:nigȣ>[aa] #grandmother, old person
lolol:lolol>[aa] #boogeyman
odana:odana>[nn] #town
wȣbanaki:wȣbanaki>[nn] #the east
gaginidoleba:gaginidoleba>[aa] #big turtle
galod:galod>[aa] #carrot
nkawadsowȣgan:nkawadsowȣgan>[nn] #hope
pezagwdamen:pezagwdamen>[aa] #blackberry
dadan:dadan>[aa] #father
kagagiiaji:kagagiiaji>[nn] #seasoned meat/anything else
kizos:kizos>[aa] #sun, moon, month
kelozowȣgan:kelozowȣgan>[nn] #word
pȣgwas:pȣgwas>[aa] #moon
managwȣn:managwȣn>[aa] #rainbow
aki:aki>[nn] #land, world
passodosawȣgan:passodosawȣgan>[nn] #approach
aodowȣgan:aodowȣgan>[nn] #war
kawhȣwawinno:kawhȣwawinno>[aa] #victor
migakawinno:migakawinno>[aa] #warrior
pazgo:pazgo>[aa] #old one
wawidahȣzwȣgan:wawidahȣzwȣgan>[nn] #awareness
pehanem:pehanem>[aa] #woman
awȣzsis:awȣzsis>[aa] #child
kȣkassigamigwzoak:kȣkassigamigwzoak>[aa] #tribe
lakamigwezo:lakamigwezo>[aa] #family
pkwami:pkwami>[aa] #snow
awahȣdos:awahȣdos>[aa] #bug
sips:sips>[aa] #bird
namas:namas>[aa] #fish
miliksanwȣgan:miliksanwȣgan>[nn] #strength
sibo:sibo>[nn] #river
nebes:nebes>[nn] #lake
pizwikw:pizwik{w}>[nn] #plant
abazi:abazi>[aa] #tree
medawlinȣgan:medawlinȣgan>[nn] #magic power
wassanmȣganihla:wassanȣganihla>[nn] #candlelight
pemegawȣgan:pemegawȣgan>[nn] #dance
wassakw:wassak{w}>[nn] #light
abasandȣganal:abasandȣganal>[nn] #Northern Lights
pebonki:pebonki>[nn] #north
milȣd:milȣd>[aa] #giver
noppawsawwino:noppawsawwinno>[aa] #scout
alakws:alakws>[aa] #star
lagwigid:lagwigid>[aa] #direction
mesakwȣd:mesakwȣd>[aa] #finder
alakwsȣwdi:alakwsȣwdi>[nn] #milky way
spemki:spemki>[nn] #above land
lȣdawȣgan:lȣdawȣgan>[nn] #ladder
sȣgaiwios:sȣgaiwios>[nn] #lobster
cape:cape>[nn] #coffee
aplesa:aples{A}>[aa] #apple
paskwaipowȣgan:pakwaipowȣgan>[nn] #lunch
pagȣnis:pagȣnis>[nn] #little nut
salsemimijowȣgan:salsemimijowȣgan>[nn] #fried food
kwanogazid:kwanogazi{D}>[aa] #pear
kalakȣn:kalakȣn>[aa] #cracker
adlȣgwipowȣgan:adlȣgwipowȣgan>[nn] #dinner
wizȣwibemi:wizȣwibemi>[aa] #butter
pkwamipaks:pkwamipaks>[nn] #fridge
skamon:skamon>[nn] #corn
wasawa:wasawa>[nn] #squash
adbakwa:adbakwa>[nn] #bean
itsakaso:itsakaso>[aa] #sister
magwa:magwa>[aa] #Iroquois
abagigek:abagigk>[nn] #flat thing

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
kchiazo:kchiazo>[aa] #old
mlikigidjik:mlikigidjik>[aa] #strong
kwina:kwina>[aa] #large
nsȣzin:nsȣzin>[aa] #dangerous
kwanakwizo:kwanakwizo>[aa] #tall
abagigen:abagigen>[nn] #flat
pȣgwi:pȣgwi>[nn] #pure
kizachozid:kizachozi{D}>[aa] #ripe
minȣboo:minȣboo>[aa] #juicy
nhloa:nhloa>[aa] #three
kwanogazid:kwanogazi{D}>[aa] #elongated

LEXICON Conjunction
ta<cnjcoo>:ta #and
kanwa<cnjcoo>:kanwa #however
ala<cnjcoo>:ala #or

LEXICON Pronoun
tȣni<prn><itg>:tȣni
tȣnga<prn><itg>:tȣnga
agma<prn><pers>:agma
agmȣwȣ<prn><pers>:agmȣwȣ
kagwi<prn><itg>:kagwi
niuna<prn><pers>:niuna
yugik<prn><det>:yugik
iya<prn>:iya
iolil<prn><det><nn>:iolil

LEXICON Adverb
ato<adv><pt>:ato
kassi<adv>:kassi
paami<adv><pt>:paami
adoji<adv><pt>:adoji
nidali<adv>:nidali
mziwi<adv>:mziwi
achi<adv><pt>:achi
chakweniwi<adv>:chakweniwi
nibȣiwiw<adv>:nibȣiwiw
pamgisgak<adv>:pamgisgak
ni<adv><pt>:ni
wigawȣjiwi<adv>:wigawȣjiwi
wlȣgwiga<adv>:wlȣgwiga
pita<adv>:pita

LEXICON Preposition
alagui<pr>:alagui
nspiwi<pr>:nspiwi
spemek<pr>:spemek
kizi<pr>:kizi
waji<pr>:waji
